ja: 適切なプールの表面タイプ: すべての表面; コンクリート; ファイバーグラス; ガンナイト; ペンキ; 小石; 石膏; タイル; ビニールライナー; その他
nl: Geschikt zwembadoppervlak: Alle oppervlakken; Beton; Glasvezel; Gunite; Geschilderd; Kiezel; Gips; Tegel; Zwembadfolie; Overig
fi: Sopiva uima-altaan pintatyyppi: Kaikki pinnat; Betoni; Lasikuitu; Ruiskubetoni; Maalattu; Kivi; Kipsi; Laatta; Vinyylivuoraus; Muu
el: Κατάλληλος τύπος επιφάνειας πισίνας: Όλες οι επιφάνειες; Σκυρόδεμα; Υαλοΐνες; Γκουνίτης; Βαμμένο; Βοτσαλωτή; Σοβατισμένη; Με πλακάκια; Επένδυση βινυλίου; Άλλο
sv: Lämplig typ av poolyta: Alla ytor; Betong; Glasfiber; Gunit; Målad; Småsten; Plåster; Bricka; Vinylfoder; Annat
zh-CN: 适用的泳池表面类型: 所有表面; 混凝土; 玻璃纤维; 喷射混凝土; 喷漆; 鹅卵石; 石膏; 瓷砖; 乙烯基衬里; 其他
ko: 적합한 수영장 표면 유형: 모든 표면용; 콘크리트; 유리 섬유; 구나이트; 페인트; 조약돌; 석고; 타일; 비닐 라이너; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta prikladne površine bazena: Sve površine; Beton; Stakloplastika; Gunit; Obojeno; Kamenčići; Gips; Pločica; Vinilna obloga; Ostalo
da: Egnet pooloverfladetype: Alle overflader; Beton; Glasfiber; Sprøjtebeton; Malet; Småsten; Puds; Klinker; Vinyldækning; Andet
sk-SK: Vhodný typ povrchu bazéna: Všetky povrchy; Betón; Sklolaminát; Striekaný betón; S náterom; Kamienky; Omietka; Dlaždice; Vinylová vložka; Iné
sl-SI: Primerna vrsta površine bazena: Vse površine; Beton; Steklena vlakna; Gunit; Pobarvan; Kamenček; Mavec; Ploščica; Vinilna obloga; Druga
lt-LT: Tinkamas baseino dangos tipas: Visi paviršiai; Betonas; Stiklo pluoštas; Gunitas; Dažytas; Akmenukai; Gipsas; Plytelės; Vinilo įdėklas; Kita
th: ประเภทพื้นสระว่ายน้ำที่เหมาะสม: พื้นผิวทั้งหมด; คอนกรีต; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; แบบกันไนต์; ทาสี; ก้อนกรวด; พลาสเตอร์; ไทล์; แผ่นไวนิลเคลือบ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Подходящ тип повърхност на басейна: Всички повърхности; Бетон; Фибростъкло; Облицовка от суха бетонова смес; Боядисано; Камъчета; Гипс; Плочки; Винилова облицовка; Друго
en: Suitable pool surface type: All surfaces; Concrete; Fiberglass; Gunite; Painted; Pebble; Plaster; Tile; Vinyl liner; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de superfície de piscina adequado: Todas as superfícies; Betão; Fibra de vidro; Gunite; Pintado; Seixo; Gesso; Azulejo; Revestimento em vinil; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de suprafață de piscină adecvată: Toate suprafețele; Beton; Fibră de sticlă; Gunită; Vopsit; Pietriș; Tencuială; Faianță; Căptușeală din vinil; Altele
vi: Loại bề mặt hồ bơi phù hợp: Mọi bề mặt; Bê tông; Sợi thủy tinh; Bê tông phun; Sơn; Đá cuội; Thạch cao; Gạch lát; Lớp lót vinyl; Khác
zh-TW: 適用泳池表面類型: 所有表面; 混凝土; 玻璃纖維; 噴漿; 塗漆; 鵝卵石; 石膏; 磁磚; 乙烯基內襯; 其他
pl: Odpowiedni rodzaj powierzchni basenu: Do wszystkich powierzchni; Beton; Włókno szklane; Gunite; Malowane; Kamyczki; Tynkowane; Płytki; Folia winylowa; Inne
ru: Подходящий тип поверхности бассейна: Все поверхности; Бетон; Стекловолокно; Гунит; Окрашенная поверхность; Галька; Штукатурка; Плитка; Виниловое покрытие; Другое
fr: Type de surface de piscine compatible: Toutes surfaces; Béton; Fibre de verre; Gunite; Peint; Galet; Plâtre; Carrelage; Doublure en vinyle; Autre
cs: Vhodný typ povrchu bazénu: Všechny povrchy; Beton; Laminát; Stříkaný beton; Nátěr; Oblázky; Omítka; Dlaždice; Vinylová vložka; Jiné
hu: Megfelelő medencefelület típusa: Minden felület; Beton; Üveggyapot; Habarcs; Festett; Kavics; Vakolat; Csempe; Vinilbélés; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de superfície de piscina adequado: Todas as superfícies; Concreto; Fibra de vidro; Concreto projetado; Pintado; Seixo; Gesso; Azulejo; Revestimento de vinil; Outro
nb: Egnet bassengoverflatetype: Alle overflater; Betong; Glassfiber; Gunitt; Malt; Småstein; Gips; Flis; Vinylforing; Annet
es: Tipo de superficie de piscina adecuada: Todas las superficies; Hormigón; Fibra de vidrio; Gunita; Pintado; Guijarro; Yeso; Azulejo; Revestimiento de vinilo; Otros
de: Geeignete Pooloberflächenart: Alle Oberflächen; Beton; Fiberglas; Spritzbeton; Bemalt; Kieselstein; Pflaster; Fliese; Vinyl-Auskleidung; Sonstiges
tr: Uygun havuz yüzey tipi: Tüm yüzeyler; Beton; Fiberglas; Püskürtme beton (Gunite); Boyalı; Çakıl; Alçı; Fayans; Vinil astar; Diğer
it: Tipo di superficie della piscina adatta: Tutte le superfici; Calcestruzzo; Vetroresina; Gunite; Dipinto; Ciottolo; Malta; Piastrelle; Rivestimento in vinile; Altro